Missouri, session 2026, HB2768.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapters 144 and 195, RSMo, are amended by adding thereto twenty-five
new sections, to be known as sections 144.028, 195.2550, 195.2555, 195.2557, 195.2558,
195.2560, 195.2563, 195.2564, 195.2565, 195.2570, 195.2575, 195.2580, 195.2585,
195.2590, 195.2595, 195.2600, 195.2605, 195.2607, 195.2610, 195.2615, 195.2617,
195.2620, 195.2625, 195.2630, and 195.2635, to read as follows:
144.028. 1. As used in this section, the term "industrial hemp-derived
consumable product" shall have the same meaning given to the term in section 195.2550.
2. For all tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2027, an excise tax is hereby
levied and imposed upon the retail sale of industrial hemp-derived consumable products
to consumers within this state. The rate of tax shall be two percent of the retail
purchase price paid or charged and shall be in addition to any tax imposed under any
other provision of federal, state, or local law.
3. The revenue derived from the two percent rate levied under this section shall
be deposited by the department of revenue into the hemp business fund established
under section 195.2563.
4. The tax imposed under this section is intended to be passed on to and borne by
the purchaser of the industrial hemp-derived consumable product. The tax is a debt
from the purchaser to the retailer until paid and is recoverable at law by the retailer in
the same manner as other debts. A retailer is considered to act as a trustee on behalf of
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2768 2
the state when it collects tax from the purchaser on a taxable transaction. The tax shall
be stated and charged separately on any documentation provided to the purchaser by
the retailer at the time of the transaction.
195.2550. As used in sections 195.2550 to 195.2635, unless the context otherwise
requires, the following terms mean:
(1) "Batch", a specific quantity of industrial hemp-derived consumable product
that is manufactured at the same time and using the same methods, equipment, and
ingredients; that is uniform and intended to meet specifications for identity, strength,
purity, and composition; and that is manufactured, packaged, and labeled according to
a single batch production record executed and documented;
(2) "Batch number", a unique numeric or alphanumeric identifier assigned to a
batch of industrial hemp-derived consumable products;
(3) "Business", any of the following licensed under sections 195.2550 to
195.2635:
(a) A distributor;
(b) A retailer; or
(c) A manufacturer;
(4) "Consumer", a person twenty-one years of age or older who purchases or
possesses an industrial hemp-derived consumable product for personal use;
(5) "Counter", the point of purchase at a retail establishment;
(6) "Distributor", a person or entity that purchases industrial hemp-derived
consumable products from manufacturers and sells them to retailers;
(7) "Division", the division of alcohol and tobacco control of the department of
public safety;
(8) "Food service establishment", an establishment where food is prepared and
served on the premises;
(9) "Franchise", a written or oral arrangement for a definite or indefinite
period, in which a person grants to another person a license to use a trade name,
trademark, service mark, or related characteristic, and in which there is a community of
interest in the marketing of goods or services at wholesale, at retail, by lease, by
agreement, or otherwise including, but not limited to, a commercial relationship of
definite duration or continuing indefinite duration between a manufacturer and a
distributor wherein a distributor is granted the right to offer, sell, and distribute within
this state or any designated area thereof some or all of the manufacturer's industrial
hemp-derived consumable products to retailers;
(10) "Hemp", the plant Cannabis sativa L. and any part of that plant, including
the seeds thereof and all derivatives, extracts, cannabinoids, isomers, acids, salts, and

HB 2768 3
salts of isomers, whether growing or not, with a delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol
concentration of not more than three-tenths of one percent on a dry-weight basis;
(11) "Hemp product", any product that contains an industrial hemp-derived
cannabinoid. The term "hemp product" shall not include:
(a) Any industrial hemp-derived product intended for topical application;
(b) Any industrial hemp-derived animal feed product;
(c) Any hemp seeds or hemp-seed-derived ingredients that are generally
recognized as safe by the United States Food and Drug Administration; or
(d) Any product that contains a cannabinoid that is not an industrial hemp-
derived cannabinoid;
(12) "Independent testing laboratory", a laboratory that meets all of the
following conditions:
(a) Holds an International Organization for Standardization (ISO) 17025
accreditation or is registered with the Drug Enforcement Administration in accordance
with 21 CFR 1301.13;
(b) Does not have a direct or indirect interest in the entity whose product is being
tested;
(c) Does not have a direct or indirect interest in a facility that cultivates,
processes, distributes, dispenses, or sells industrial hemp-derived consumable products
in this state or any other jurisdiction; and
(d) Performs tetrahydrocannabinol concentration sampling and testing using the
high-performance liquid chromatography (HPLC) method or, when appropriate, gas
chromatography;
(13) "Industrial hemp-derived cannabinoid", any cannabinoid naturally
occurring in, and originating from, the hemp plant including, but not limited to,
delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol (delta-9 THC), tetrahydrocannabinolic acid (THCA),
cannabidiol (CBD), cannabidiolic acid (CBDA), cannabinol (CBN), cannabigerol
(CBG), cannabichromene (CBC), cannabicyclol (CBL), cannabivarin (CBV),
tetrahydrocannabivarin (THCV), cannabidivarin (CBDV), cannabicitran (CBT), and
delta-8 tetrahydrocannabinol (delta-8 THC). The term "industrial hemp-derived
cannabinoid" also includes any synthetic cannabinoid or semi-synthetic cannabinoid
with the same molecular structure as a cannabinoid naturally occurring in the hemp
plant as long as such cannabinoid was derived from the hemp plant;
(14) "Industrial hemp-derived consumable beverage product", an industrial
hemp-derived consumable product that is a liquid intended for ingestion and that is not
a tincture;

HB 2768 4
(15) "Industrial hemp-derived consumable product", a hemp product that is a
finished good intended for human ingestion or inhalation and that does not contain a
total delta-9 THC concentration of more than three-tenths of one percent on a dry-
weight basis;
(16) "Ingestion", the process of consuming an industrial hemp-derived
consumable product through the mouth by swallowing into the gastrointestinal
system or through tissue absorption;
(17) "Inhalation", the process of consuming an industrial hemp-derived
consumable product through the respiratory system through the mouth or nasal
passageway;
(18) "License", a license issued in accordance with sections 195.2550 to
195.2635;
(19) "Manufacture", to compound, blend, extract, infuse, cook, bake, or
otherwise make or prepare products containing an industrial hemp-derived
cannabinoid, including the processes of extraction, infusion, packaging, repackaging,
labeling, and relabeling of products containing an industrial hemp-derived
cannabinoid;
(20) "Manufacturer":
(a) Any person who engages in the process of manufacturing, preparing, or
packaging industrial hemp-derived consumable products; or
(b) Any supplier of industrial hemp-derived consumable products who contracts
with a third party described in paragraph (a) of this subdivision for the production of
the supplier's industrial hemp-derived consumable products;
(21) "On-premises retailer", a retailer that sells industrial hemp-derived
consumable products for on-site consumption;
(22) "Proof of age", a valid driver's license or other government-issued
identification card that contains a photograph of the person and confirms the person's
age as twenty-one years of age or older;
(23) "Retail establishment", a place of business open to the general public for
100 the sale of goods or services;
101 (24) "Retailer", a person or entity that sells industrial hemp-derived consumable
102 products for consumption and not for resale. The term "retailer" shall include on-
103 premises retailers and any food service establishments engaged in such sales;
104 (25) "Serving", the amount of an industrial hemp-derived consumable product
105 the manufacturer suggests be consumed at a single time;

HB 2768 5
106 (26) "Tincture", an industrial hemp-derived consumable product that is a
107 hemp-infused liquid or oil administered orally in small amounts using a dropper that
108 indicates the serving size.
195.2555. 1. A person shall not:
(1) Knowingly sell or distribute an industrial hemp-derived consumable product
to a person who is under twenty-one years of age;
(2) Knowingly purchase an industrial hemp-derived consumable product on
behalf of a person who is under twenty-one years of age;
(3) Knowingly persuade, entice, send, or assist a person who is under twenty-one
years of age to purchase, acquire, receive, or attempt to purchase an industrial hemp-
derived consumable product;
(4) Knowingly distribute free samples of an industrial hemp-derived consumable
product in or on a public street, sidewalk, or park without first obtaining a temporary
event permit from the division;
(5) Knowingly sell industrial hemp-derived consumable products in or on a
public street, sidewalk, or park without first obtaining a temporary event permit from
the division; or
(6) Knowingly sell or distribute an industrial hemp-derived consumable product
without having first obtained proof of age from the prospective purchaser or recipient
unless an ordinary person would conclude on the basis of appearance that the
prospective purchaser or recipient is not under twenty-one years of age.
2. (1) A person under twenty-one years of age shall not:
(a) Knowingly purchase, possess, or accept receipt of an industrial hemp-derived
consumable product; or
(b) Knowingly present purported proof of age that is false or fraudulent or that
does not actually identify the person for the purpose of purchasing or receiving an
industrial hemp-derived consumable product.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (1) of this subsection to the
contrary, it shall be lawful, and shall not constitute a violation of sections 195.2550 to
195.2635, for a person under twenty-one years of age to consume industrial hemp-
derived consumable products under the supervision of the person's parent or legal
guardian or in accordance with the provisions of section 195.2635. Nothing in this
subdivision shall be construed to alter the prohibition on persons under twenty-one
years of age possessing industrial hemp-derived consumable products.
3. A retailer or retail establishment shall maintain any industrial hemp-derived
consumable product other than industrial hemp-derived consumable beverage products
on or behind the counter, in an area or retail establishment restricted to adults twenty-

HB 2768 6
one years of age or older, or in a locked cabinet. Any industrial hemp-derived
consumable beverage product, including those in cases or boxes, offered for retail sale
shall be merchandised in such a manner, which may include, but shall not be limited to,
signage, shelf-talkers, and stickers on cooler doors, so as to clearly indicate to consumers
the products contain industrial hemp-derived cannabinoids and are for sale only to
persons twenty-one years of age or older.
4. Any person who violates any provision of this section shall be subject to a fine
not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars for a first violation to be paid into the state
school moneys fund established under section 166.051 as provided by law for other fines
and penalties. The penalty for any second or subsequent violation shall be a class D
misdemeanor.
5. The division shall enforce sections 195.2550 to 195.2635 in a manner that may
be required or mandated to reduce the extent to which industrial hemp-derived
consumable products are sold or distributed to persons under twenty-one years of age
and shall conduct inspections at locations where such products are sold or distributed to
ensure compliance with sections 195.2550 to 195.2635.
6. Nothing in this section shall prohibit law enforcement from using the
following persons to enforce the provisions of this section:
(1) Any minor under eighteen years of age if the minor's parent or legal
guardian has consented to the minor's involvement in the enforcement effort; and
(2) Any person eighteen years of age or older and under twenty-one years of age
if the person has consented to his or her involvement in the enforcement effort.
195.2557. 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of this chapter or chapter 579 or
any other provision of law to the contrary, any person who manufactures, processes,
packages, distributes, transports, or sells industrial hemp-derived consumable products
in accordance with sections 195.2550 to 195.2635 and rules promulgated thereunder
shall not be subject to criminal prosecution, civil penalty, administrative sanction, or
professional discipline under the laws of this state.
2. Except as specifically provided in sections 195.2550 to 195.2635, any consumer
who purchases, possesses, or uses an industrial hemp-derived consumable product
lawful under sections 195.2550 to 195.2635 shall not be subject to arrest, criminal
prosecution, civil penalty, forfeiture, or any other adverse action under state law.
3. Possession of an industrial hemp-derived consumable product lawful under
sections 195.2550 to 195.2635 shall not constitute probable cause or reasonable suspicion
for a stop, search, seizure, or arrest by any state or local law enforcement officer.
4. Except as specifically provided in sections 195.2550 to 195.2635, the possession
or use of lawful industrial hemp-derived consumable products shall not be grounds for:

HB 2768 7
(1) Denial of employment;
(2) Denial of education or public accommodations;
(3) Loss of child custody or visitation;
(4) Denial of state benefits; or
(5) The initiation of civil or criminal proceedings under state law.
195.2558. 1. No state agency, political subdivision, state or local law enforcement
officer, state or local prosecutor, or state employee shall expend public funds, use
personnel, share information, or otherwise assist in the investigation, detention, arrest,
or prosecution of any manufacturer, distributor, retailer, or consumer for conduct
involving industrial hemp-derived consumable products that is lawful under sections
195.2550 to 195.2635.
2. This section shall not prohibit compliance with a valid federal court order or
the sharing of information required under federal grant conditions unrelated to
enforcement of federal drug laws.
3. A violation of this section shall constitute unauthorized use of public resources
and may result in disciplinary action under state law.
195.2560. 1. A person or entity that is in the business of industrial hemp-derived
consumable products in this state, including any manufacturer, distributor, or retailer,
shall obtain a license from the division authorizing the person or entity to engage in that
business prior to the commencement of the business or, for a business operating before
the effective date of the rules promulgated under sections 195.2550 to 195.2635, within a
time period specified by the division by rule.
2. Any person or entity engaging in the business of manufacturing or selling
industrial hemp-derived consumable products in this state without a valid license
required under sections 195.2550 to 195.2635 shall be subject to a fine not to exceed one
thousand dollars.
3. (1) Any license granted to a retailer shall be location specific. The division
shall require a retailer to obtain a separate license for each location at which the retailer
sells industrial hemp-derived consumable products for consumption.
(2) Any license granted to a manufacturer or distributor shall be location
specific. The division shall require a manufacturer or distributor to obtain a separate
license for each location at which the manufacturer or distributor operates.
4. To obtain and maintain a manufacturer, distributor, or retailer license under
this section, a person or entity shall:
(1) Submit to the division information the division prescribes as necessary for
the efficient enforcement of sections 195.2550 to 195.2635;
(2) For initial licensing, pay to the division a fee of:

HB 2768 8
(a) For manufacturers and distributors, five hundred dollars per location; and
(b) For retailers, two hundred fifty dollars per location; and
(3) Consent to inspection and sampling by the division of the person's or entity's
inventory of industrial hemp-derived consumable products.
5. A license issued under this section shall be valid for a period of one year and
may be renewed annually. The division shall charge an annual renewal fee of:
(1) For manufacturers and distributors, two hundred fifty dollars per location;
and
(2) For retailers, one hundred dollars per location.
6. The division may warn or place on probation the holder of a license, or
suspend, deny, or revoke a license, for any violation of sections 195.2550 to 195.2635 or
the rules promulgated under sections 195.2550 to 195.2635.
7. No more than ninety days after the promulgation of rules under sections
195.2550 to 195.2635, the division shall issue licenses for the manufacture, distribution,
and sale of industrial hemp-derived consumable products in this state.
8. Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, any applicant that meets
the requirements set forth in sections 195.2550 to 195.2635 shall be issued a license by
the division. Beginning July 1, 2027, a license application shall be automatically deemed
approved, and a license shall be issued, if the division fails to approve or deny the
application within forty-five days of the date of the submission of the application.
9. All fees payable under this section shall be collected by the division and
transmitted to the department of revenue for deposit in the state treasury to the credit of
the hemp business fund established under section 195.2563.
10. (1) Beginning on the effective date of this section and continuing thereafter,
no new retail establishments offering industrial hemp-derived consumable products
shall be located within one thousand feet of any educational institution, public or
private, providing elementary or secondary education to children at any level from
kindergarten through grade twelve or at any equivalent level if the institution does not
use grade divisions.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (1) of this subsection, a retail
establishment that was operating within one thousand feet of any educational institution
described in subdivision (1) of this subsection before the effective date of this section
that changes ownership on or after the effective date of this section shall be permitted to
operate in the same location.
195.2563. 1. There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Hemp Business
Fund", which shall consist of all fees authorized to be charged by the division under
section 195.2560 as well as the excise tax revenue collected under sections 144.028 and

HB 2768 9
195.2617 designated for deposit into the fund. The state treasurer shall be custodian of
the fund. In accordance with sections 30.170 and 30.180, the state treasurer may
approve disbursements. The fund shall be a dedicated fund and, upon appropriation,
moneys in this fund shall be used solely for the administration of sections 195.2550 to
195.2635.
2. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, any moneys
remaining in the fund at the end of the biennium shall revert to the credit of the hemp
industry grant fund established under section 195.2564.
3. The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the same manner as
other funds are invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
credited to the hemp industry grant fund established under section 195.2564.
195.2564. 1. The department of agriculture shall establish a grant program to
support the state's hemp industry. The department shall award grants, in amounts to be
determined by the department, to eligible individuals and entities.
2. The department of agriculture shall establish and post on its website eligibility
criteria, criteria for determining the amount and duration of grants, the contents of the
grant application, and the procedures and timelines by which individuals and entities
may apply for grants.
3. As a condition of awarding a grant, the department of agriculture shall
require the individual or entity to use the grant moneys to engage in activities that
advance the growth and sustainability of the state's hemp industry including, but not
limited to, cultivation, processing, research, market development, and workforce
training.
4. (1) There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Hemp Industry Grant
Fund", which shall consist of any moneys credited to the fund in accordance with
section 195.2563. The state treasurer shall be custodian of the fund. In accordance with
sections 30.170 and 30.180, the state treasurer may approve disbursements. The fund
shall be a dedicated fund and, upon appropriation, moneys in this fund shall be used
solely to award grants as provided in this section.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, any moneys
remaining in the fund at the end of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the
general revenue fund.
(3) The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the same manner as
other funds are invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
credited to the fund.

HB 2768 10
195.2565. 1. Before April 1, 2027, the division shall promulgate rules on the
licensure of industrial hemp-derived consumable product businesses to implement the
provisions of sections 195.2550 to 195.2635. The rules shall, at a minimum:
(1) Set forth application forms and guidelines for obtaining a license as an
industrial hemp-derived consumable product business;
(2) Specify the date by which industrial hemp-derived consumable product
businesses operating before the effective date of the rules promulgated under this
section shall obtain a license to continue operating; and
(3) Set forth requirements for business operations in accordance with sections
195.2550 to 195.2635.
2. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
created under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it
complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers
vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the
effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional,
then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after the
effective date of this section shall be invalid and void.
195.2570. 1. Industrial hemp-derived consumable products shall be tested in
accordance with the requirements of this section. The division shall oversee all testing of
industrial hemp-derived consumable products.
2. (1) The division shall maintain and post on its website a registry of
independent testing laboratories, located both in this state and outside this state, that
are qualified to test intermediate manufactured material and finished products
containing an industrial hemp-derived cannabinoid.
(2) The division shall develop an application and process by which qualifying
laboratories, located both in this state and outside this state, are listed on its website. An
application submitted by a potentially qualifying laboratory shall include a sample
certificate of analysis issued by the applying laboratory.
(3) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection,
independent testing laboratories wishing to test industrial hemp-derived consumable
products subject to the requirements of sections 195.2550 to 195.2635 shall register
immediately with the division.
(4) The division shall not have cause to examine, inspect, or regulate any
registered independent testing laboratory for compliance with the requirements of
sections 195.2550 to 195.2635 so long as the laboratory demonstrates current and valid:

HB 2768 11
(a) Accreditation in accordance with standard ISO/IEC 17025 of the
International Organization for Standardization (ISO); or
(b) Registration with the federal Drug Enforcement Administration.
3. (1) A manufacturer shall ensure its industrial hemp-derived consumable
product is tested prior to distribution to a distributor or prior to distribution to a
retailer and shall be responsible for the cost of the testing.
(2) A distributor shall not be required to test the industrial hemp-derived
consumable product, excluding hemp flower or products containing hemp flower, if the
industrial hemp-derived consumable product is packaged in a manner that may be sold
to the ultimate consumer of the product when delivered to the distributor and the
distributor does not open such package. A distributor shall be required to test the
industrial hemp-derived consumable product prior to distribution if the industrial
hemp-derived consumable product is not packaged in a manner that may be sold to the
ultimate consumer of the product when delivered to the distributor or if the distributor
opens any package. A distributor required to test the industrial hemp-derived
consumable product shall be responsible for the cost of the testing.
(3) A retailer shall not sell at retail hemp flower or a product containing hemp
flower that is not accompanied by a certificate of analysis issued from an independent
testing laboratory within the previous one-year period demonstrating that the hemp
flower or product containing hemp flower has a concentration of delta-9 THC of not
more than three-tenths of one percent on a dry-weight basis at the time of packaging.
(4) The testing required under this subsection shall determine the presence and
amounts of any of the substances listed in subsection 4 of this section. No product that
contains more than the maximum amount indicated for any substance in subsection 4 of
this section shall be distributed or sold in this state.
4. (1) The division shall promulgate regulations specifying pass or fail action
levels for safety and toxicity for industrial hemp-derived consumable products with
respect to the testing required by this section. All industrial hemp-derived consumable
products offered for sale or distribution in this state shall be tested for the presence of
and amounts of the following substances:
(a) Heavy metals;
(b) Pesticides;
(c) Mycotoxins;
(d) Solvents; and
(e) Microbials.
(2) Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
created under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it

HB 2768 12
complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers
vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the
effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional,
then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after the
effective date of this section shall be invalid and void.
(3) The rules promulgated by the division under this subsection on testing
requirements for industrial hemp-derived consumable products shall be the same as the
testing requirements for marijuana set forth in 19 CSR 100-1.110(7).
5. A manufacturer or distributor shall contract with an independent testing
laboratory to provide the testing required under subsection 3 of this section.
6. An independent testing laboratory providing testing required under
subsection 3 of this section shall use high-performance liquid chromatography
(HPLC) or, when appropriate, gas chromatography, for potency testing.
7. Each industrial hemp-derived consumable product tested in accordance with
this section shall be accompanied by a validly issued certificate of analysis from an
independent testing laboratory that demonstrates:
(1) The batch number;
(2) The date received;
(3) The date of completion;
(4) The method of analysis for each test conducted; and
(5) Proof that the certificate of analysis is connected to the product.
8. Each batch manufactured shall undergo testing and obtain a certificate of
analysis by a state-registered independent testing laboratory.
9. An industrial hemp-derived consumable product shall have a best-by date on
the label that conforms with any applicable federal law and that shall be no more than
two years from the date of publication of the product's laboratory testing report
required by subsection 3 of this section.
195.2575. 1. The label of an industrial hemp-derived consumable product
offered for distribution or sale in this state shall contain the following information, in
not less than three-point font:
(1) Product name or common name, on the front of the label;
(2) Brand name, on the front of the label;
(3) Size of the container or net count of individual items, on the front of the
label;
(4) Net weight or volume;

HB 2768 13
(5) Suggested product use, including serving sizes if the product is intended for
ingestion or inhalation;
(6) List of ingredients, including:
(a) The amount of any advertised cannabinoid, in milligrams; and
(b) The amount of any primary cannabinoid, in milligrams;
(7) List of allergens if any of the major allergens identified by the United States
Food and Drug Administration (FDA) could be present or if the product is
manufactured in a lab that uses any of those major allergens identified by the FDA
in the Food Allergen Labeling and Consumer Protection Act of 2004;
(8) The name and address of the manufacturer or distributor;
(9) Batch number;
(10) A statement that use while pregnant or breast-feeding may be harmful;
(11) A statement that the product contains industrial hemp-derived
cannabinoids and that consumption of certain cannabinoids may impair the
consumer's ability to drive or operate heavy machinery;
(12) A statement to keep out of the reach of children;
(13) A statement that the product is only for persons twenty-one years of age or
older;
(14) A statement to consult a physician before use;
(15) A statement that consuming industrial hemp-derived consumable products
may result in a failed drug test; and
(16) A best-by date in accordance with section 195.2570.
2. The label of each industrial hemp-derived consumable product shall include
the following text: "This product has not been evaluated by the Food and Drug
Administration. This product is not intended to diagnose, treat, cure, mitigate, or
prevent any disease.".
3. Industrial hemp-derived consumable product labels shall not:
(1) Bear any likeness or reasonable resemblance to a cartoon or fictional
character in a manner designed or reasonably likely to appeal to children;
(2) Appear to imitate a food, candy, or other commonly available snack product
that is typically marketed toward or appealing to children; or
(3) Infringe upon any trademarks protected by the United States Patent and
Trademark Office or the Missouri office of the secretary of state.
195.2580. 1. An industrial hemp-derived consumable product that is sold in this
state shall be labeled in accordance with section 195.2575 and include a quick response
code that directs consumers to all label information required by section 195.2575 and all
information required by section 195.2570.

HB 2768 14
2. All industrial hemp-derived consumable products offered for sale in this state
other than industrial hemp-derived consumable beverage products shall satisfy the
child-resistant effectiveness standards under 16 CFR 1700.15(b)(1) when tested in
accordance with the requirements set forth in 16 CFR 1700.20.
3. (1) An industrial hemp-derived consumable product that is sold in this state
shall be manufactured in the United States under all applicable laws governing the
manufacture of industrial hemp-derived products in its jurisdiction of origin including,
but not limited to, abiding by Current Good Manufacturing Practices (CGMP) and
Generally Recognized as Safe (GRAS) standards.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (1) of this subsection,
cannabinoids are allowed in an industrial hemp-derived consumable product despite not
having GRAS status. All ingredients other than cannabinoids in the final industrial
hemp-derived consumable product shall have GRAS status.
4. Any industrial hemp-derived consumable product that is sold in this state
shall not be sold without a validly issued certificate of analysis issued by an independent
testing laboratory within the previous twenty-four months.
5. Any industrial hemp-derived consumable product that is sold in this state and
that is intended for ingestion and that is not intended for inhalation, other than an
industrial hemp-derived consumable beverage product, shall not:
(1) Be sold in a serving that contains more than twenty-five milligrams, in the
aggregate, of delta-8 THC and delta-9 THC;
(2) Be formed in the shape of an animal or cartoon character;
(3) Be sold in such a manner that a single serving is less than one piece unless
serving sizes are clearly marked and easily divided without the use of a knife or tool; or
(4) Be sold in a container or package containing more than five hundred
milligrams, in the aggregate, of delta-8 THC and delta-9 THC.
6. Any industrial hemp-derived consumable beverage product intended for
ingestion that is sold in this state shall not:
(1) Be sold in a serving that contains more than ten milligrams, in the aggregate,
of delta-8 THC and delta-9 THC;
(2) Be sold in a single-use package with more than ten milligrams, in the
aggregate, of delta-8 THC and delta-9 THC unless:
(a) The package is resealable with a child-resistant cap;
(b) The package contains serving sizes of not more than ten milligrams, in the
aggregate, of delta-8 THC and delta-9 THC and clearly indicates so on the package; and
(c) The volume of the final product for the package is a minimum of seven
hundred fifty milliliters in total; or

HB 2768 15
(3) Be sold in a container or package containing more than one hundred
milligrams, in the aggregate, of delta-8 THC and delta-9 THC.
7. (1) Any industrial hemp-derived tincture containing delta-9 THC intended
for ingestion that is sold in this state shall not:
(a) Be sold in a one-ounce package containing more than eighty-five milligrams
of delta-9 THC; or
(b) Be sold in a two-ounce package containing more than one hundred seventy
milligrams of delta-9 THC.
(2) Any industrial hemp-derived tincture containing delta-8 THC or any other
psychoactive cannabinoid intended for ingestion that is sold in this state shall not:
(a) Be sold in a one-ounce package containing more than one hundred fifty
milligrams, in the aggregate, of delta-8 THC and any other psychoactive cannabinoid;
or
(b) Be sold in a two-ounce package containing more than three hundred
milligrams, in the aggregate, of delta-8 THC and any other psychoactive cannabinoid.
(3) Any industrial hemp-derived tincture that is sold in this state shall not be
sold in a package of more than two ounces.
8. Any industrial hemp-derived consumable product intended for inhalation that
is a concentrate sold in this state shall not:
(1) Be sold in a container that contains more than five milliliters or five grams of
industrial hemp-derived cannabinoids, in the aggregate, of delta-8 THC and delta-9
THC; or
(2) Contain any amount of vitamin E acetate oil in any quantity.
9. An industrial hemp-derived consumable product that is sold or offered for
sale in violation of sections 195.2550 to 195.2635 shall be subject to seizure and
forfeiture.
195.2585. 1. A retailer or manufacturer of an industrial hemp-derived
consumable product shall not advertise, market, or offer for sale an industrial hemp-
derived consumable product by using any trade dress, trademark, branding, or related
imagery or scenery that is prohibited under this section in the labeling or design of the
product or product packaging or in advertising or marketing materials for the product.
2. Any trade dress, trademark, branding, or related imagery or scenery shall be
prohibited under this section if the trade dress, trademark, branding, or related
imagery or scenery depicts or signifies characters or symbols known to appeal primarily
to persons under twenty-one years of age or mimics commonly available candy or snack
products.

HB 2768 16
3. Nothing in this section prohibits the use of drawings, illustrations, or artwork
depicting nonmythical creatures, inanimate objects, scenery, humanoid characters,
fruit- or flavor-focused images, or any other items not known to appeal primarily to
persons under twenty-one years of age.
195.2590. 1. Sections 195.2550 to 195.2635 shall not be construed to permit a
person to undertake any task while impaired by the use of an industrial hemp-derived
consumable product if doing so would constitute negligence or professional malpractice.
2. (1) A person shall not operate, navigate, or be in actual physical control of a
motor vehicle, aircraft, motorized watercraft, or any other vehicle while impaired by the
use of an industrial hemp-derived consumable product.
(2) Conduct while intoxicated from the use of an industrial hemp-derived
consumable product shall be subject to the penalties for driving while intoxicated under
section 577.010 in the same manner that conduct while intoxicated from the use of any
other drug is subject to such penalties.
3. (1) A person shall not drive a motor vehicle on a public road while consuming
an industrial hemp-derived consumable beverage product.
(2) A person shall not possess an open container of an industrial hemp-derived
consumable beverage product while driving a motor vehicle on a public road.
(3) A violation of subdivision (1) or (2) of this subsection is an infraction for
which four points shall be assessed to the person's driving record.
4. Sections 195.2550 to 195.2635 shall not require an employer to accommodate
the use of an industrial hemp-derived consumable product in the workplace or an
employee working while impaired by the use of an industrial hemp-derived consumable
product.
5. Sections 195.2550 to 195.2635 shall not exempt a person from prosecution for
a criminal offense related to impairment or intoxication resulting from the use of an
industrial hemp-derived consumable product or relieve a person from any requirement
under the law to submit to a breath, blood, urine, or other test to detect the presence of a
controlled substance.
195.2595. 1. Nothing in sections 195.2550 to 195.2635 shall prohibit industrial
hemp-derived consumable beverage product manufacturers from assigning exclusive
territories for distribution of industrial hemp-derived consumable beverage products.
2. (1) An industrial hemp-derived consumable beverage product manufacturer
shall not directly solicit, sell, or otherwise convey industrial hemp-derived consumable
beverage products to retailers. Industrial hemp-derived consumable beverage product
manufacturers are authorized to solicit and sell industrial hemp-derived consumable
beverage products to industrial hemp-derived consumable beverage product

HB 2768 17
distributors. Industrial hemp-derived consumable beverage product distributors are
authorized to solicit and sell industrial hemp-derived consumable beverage products to
industrial hemp-derived consumable beverage product retailers.
(2) The prohibitions of this subsection shall not apply to any industrial hemp-
derived consumable beverage product manufacturer who sells less than four thousand
five hundred gallons of the product each year within this state.
(3) The prohibitions of this subsection shall not apply to any industrial hemp-
derived consumable beverage product manufacturer before August 28, 2028.
195.2600. 1. Each industrial hemp-derived consumable product distributed or
available for distribution in this state shall be officially registered with the division and
shall comply with the requirements of this section.
2. Application for registration shall be made to the division on a form provided
by the division and shall include the following information:
(1) The name and address of the applicant;
(2) The name and address of the person whose name will appear on the label if
such person is not the applicant;
(3) The name of the product;
(4) The type and use of the product;
(5) A complete copy of the label as it will appear on the product in a legible
format;
(6) If the product has been assigned a National Drug Code in accordance with 21
CFR 207.33, the National Drug Code number; and
(7) The applicant's proof of using Current Good Manufacturing Practices
(CGMP) and Generally Recognized as Safe (GRAS) standards as required under
sections 195.2550 to 195.2635.
3. The application for registration shall include a certificate of analysis for the
industrial hemp-derived consumable product that is from an independent testing
laboratory and that meets the requirements set forth in rules promulgated by the
division.
4. The division may deny registration for an incomplete application.
5. A new registration is required for any of the following:
(1) Any change in an industrial hemp-derived consumable product's ingredients;
(2) Any change to the directions for use; and
(3) Any change of name for the product.
6. Any change not described in subsection 5 of this section shall not require a
new registration, but the registrant shall submit copies of each label change to the
division as soon as the change is effective.

HB 2768 18
7. The registrant is responsible for the accuracy and completeness of the
information submitted.
8. An industrial hemp-derived consumable product that has been discontinued
shall continue to be registered in the state until the product is no longer available for
distribution.
195.2605. 1. Testing of any industrial hemp-derived consumable product for
purposes of sections 195.2550 to 195.2635 shall be conducted on the industrial hemp-
derived consumable product in its final form in accordance with the requirements set
forth in section 195.2570.
2. The certificate of analysis for an industrial hemp-derived consumable product
shall report the test results required in section 195.2570 in specified units of measure
and in accordance with the requirements for an industrial hemp-derived consumable
product in section 195.2580.
195.2607. 1. The division shall conduct randomized inspections of industrial
hemp-derived consumable products distributed or available for distribution in this state
for compliance with the requirements of sections 195.2550 to 195.2635.
2. The division shall periodically sample, analyze, and test industrial hemp-
derived consumable products distributed within this state for compliance with
registration and labeling requirements and the certificate of analysis.
3. The division may conduct inspections of industrial hemp-derived consumable
products distributed or available for distribution for any reason the division deems
necessary.
195.2610. 1. All retail establishments and food service establishments offering
industrial hemp-derived consumable products shall be licensed by the division in
accordance with sections 195.2550 to 195.2635.
2. An industrial hemp-derived consumable product may be sold by on-premises
retailers or in food service establishments if the industrial hemp-derived consumable
product has been registered in accordance with section 195.2600. Any other industrial
hemp-derived consumable product or class of products shall not be sold by on-premises
retailers or in food service establishments.
3. A retail establishment, on-premises retailer, or food service establishment
shall not offer industrial hemp-derived consumable products at a temporary event or
festival unless the retail establishment, on-premises retailer, or food service
establishment is licensed by the division in accordance with sections 195.2550 to
195.2635 and obtains a temporary event permit from the division. To obtain the
temporary event permit, the retail establishment, on-premises retailer, or food service
establishment shall pay to the division a fee of twenty-five dollars.

HB 2768 19
4. A business that distributes, sells, or serves industrial hemp-derived
consumable products shall not permit any person who is under twenty-one years of
age to serve industrial hemp-derived consumable products unless the person is an
employee of the business who is eighteen years of age or older and under the direct
supervision of a person twenty-one years of age or older.
5. An industrial hemp-derived consumable product shall not be sold for on-site
consumption unless the prospective purchaser or recipient has presented proof of age or
an ordinary person would conclude on the basis of appearance that the prospective
purchaser or recipient is not under twenty-one years of age.
6. Except as set forth in this section, only prepackaged registered industrial
hemp-derived consumable products shall be offered for direct consumption at on-
premises retailers or food service establishments.
7. Industrial hemp-derived consumable products may be combined with
nonalcoholic ingestible beverage products at an on-premises retailer or food service
establishment.
8. On-premises retailers and food service establishments serving industrial
hemp-derived consumable products shall not provide industrial hemp-derived
consumable products to individuals who are believed to be intoxicated.
9. An on-premises retailer or food service establishment offering any industrial
hemp-derived consumable product shall provide to consumers upon request:
(1) The common name of the product; and
(2) The distributor or manufacturer of the product.
10. On-site sampling of industrial hemp-derived consumable products provided
by a manufacturer at the manufacturer's place of business is permitted, provided that
the persons sampling are twenty-one years of age or older and the sampling is conducted
in a manner that reflects responsible serving practices.
195.2615. The division may regulate the advertising and promotion of industrial
hemp-derived consumable product sales, but any such regulation shall be no more
stringent than comparable state regulations on the advertising and promotion of alcohol
sales.
195.2617. For all tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2027, an excise tax is
levied and imposed upon the retail sale of industrial hemp-derived consumable products
to consumers within this state at the rate and in the manner set forth in section 144.028.
195.2620. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Good cause":
(a) Failure by the industrial hemp-derived consumable beverage product
distributor to comply substantially with the provisions of an agreement or

HB 2768 20
understanding with the industrial hemp-derived consumable beverage product
manufacturer if the provisions are both essential and reasonable;
(b) Use of bad faith or failure to observe reasonable commercial standards of
fair dealing in the trade; or
(c) Revocation or suspension for more than thirty days of the industrial hemp-
derived consumable beverage product distributor's state or local license required for the
normal operations of its business;
(2) "Good faith", the duty of each party to any franchise and all officers,
employees, or agents thereof to act in a fair and equitable manner toward each other.
2. If more than one franchise for the same brand or brands of industrial hemp-
derived consumable beverage products is granted to different industrial hemp-derived
consumable beverage product distributors in this state, it shall be unlawful for any
industrial hemp-derived consumable beverage product manufacturer to discriminate
between the distributors with respect to any of the terms, provisions, and conditions of
these franchises.
3. Notwithstanding the terms, provisions, and conditions of any franchise, no
industrial hemp-derived consumable beverage product manufacturer shall unilaterally
terminate or refuse to continue or change substantially the condition of any franchise
with the industrial hemp-derived consumable beverage product distributor unless the
manufacturer has first established good cause for such termination, noncontinuance, or
change.
4. Any industrial hemp-derived consumable beverage product distributor may
bring an action in a court of competent jurisdiction against an industrial hemp-derived
consumable beverage product manufacturer for violation of any of the provisions of this
section and may recover damages sustained by such distributor together with the costs
of the action and reasonable attorney's fees.
5. In any action brought by an industrial hemp-derived consumable beverage
product distributor against an industrial hemp-derived consumable beverage product
manufacturer for termination, noncontinuance, or substantial change in violation of the
provisions of this section, it is a complete defense for the industrial hemp-derived
consumable beverage product manufacturer to prove that the termination,
noncontinuance, or substantial change was done in good faith and for good cause.
195.2625. 1. Any manufacturer licensed under sections 195.2550 to 195.2635,
including its affiliates, officers, directors, employees, and agents, shall be indemnified
from any and all claims, losses, liabilities, damages, costs, and expenses, including
reasonable attorney's fees and litigation costs, arising out of any:

HB 2768 21
(1) Untrue representation, breach of warranty, or nonfulfillment by any retailer
or distributor of any obligation under sections 195.2550 to 195.2635;
(2) Negligent act or omission, or willful misconduct, of a retailer or distributor
licensed under sections 195.2550 to 195.2635, including its employees, agents, or
representatives, in connection with industrial hemp-derived consumable products; or
(3) Bodily injury or property damage to third parties arising from any conduct
by a retailer or distributor licensed under sections 195.2550 to 195.2635 in connection
with:
(a) Any marketing, distribution, or sale of industrial hemp-derived consumable
products under sections 195.2550 to 195.2635, including the storage, transportation, and
delivery of the products; or
(b) Any actual or alleged defect in an industrial hemp-derived consumable
product or in the labeling or packaging of the product.
2. Any distributor licensed under sections 195.2550 to 195.2635, including its
affiliates, officers, directors, employees, and agents, shall be indemnified from any and
all claims, losses, liabilities, damages, costs, and expenses, including reasonable
attorney's fees and litigation costs, arising out of any:
(1) Untrue representation, breach of warranty, or nonfulfillment by any
manufacturer or retailer of any obligation under sections 195.2550 to 195.2635;
(2) Negligent act or omission, or willful misconduct, of a manufacturer or
retailer licensed under sections 195.2550 to 195.2635, including its employees, agents, or
representatives, in connection with industrial hemp-derived consumable products; or
(3) Bodily injury or property damage to third parties arising from any conduct
by a manufacturer or retailer licensed under sections 195.2550 to 195.2635 in connection
with:
(a) Any marketing, distribution, or sale of industrial hemp-derived consumable
products under sections 195.2550 to 195.2635, including the storage, transportation, and
delivery of the products; or
(b) Any actual or alleged defect in an industrial hemp-derived consumable
product or in the labeling or packaging of the product.
3. Any retailer licensed under sections 195.2550 to 195.2635, including its
affiliates, officers, directors, employees, and agents, shall be indemnified from any and
all claims, losses, liabilities, damages, costs, and expenses, including reasonable
attorney's fees and litigation costs, arising out of any:
(1) Untrue representation, breach of warranty, or nonfulfillment by any
manufacturer or distributor of any obligation under sections 195.2550 to 195.2635;

HB 2768 22
(2) Negligent act or omission, or willful misconduct, of a manufacturer or
distributor licensed under sections 195.2550 to 195.2635, including its employees, agents,
or representatives, in connection with industrial hemp-derived consumable products; or
(3) Bodily injury or property damage to third parties arising from any conduct
by a manufacturer or distributor licensed under sections 195.2550 to 195.2635 in
connection with:
(a) Any marketing, distribution, or sale of industrial hemp-derived consumable
products under sections 195.2550 to 195.2635, including the storage, transportation, and
delivery of the products; or
(b) Any actual or alleged defect in an industrial hemp-derived consumable
product or in the labeling or packaging of the product.
195.2630. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Safe harbor hemp product", an industrial hemp-derived compound or
industrial hemp-derived cannabinoid, whether a finished product or in the process of
being produced, that is manufactured for distribution, produced for distribution,
packaged for distribution, processed for distribution, prepared for distribution, treated
for distribution, transported for distribution, or held for distribution in this state for
export from this state for distribution or resale but that is not sold or distributed in this
state;
(2) "Safe harbor manufacturer or storage facility", a facility that manufactures
for distribution, produces for distribution, packages for distribution, processes for
distribution, prepares for distribution, treats for distribution, transports for
distribution, or holds for distribution a safe harbor hemp product.
2. Sections 195.2550 to 195.2635 shall not apply to any:
(1) Safe harbor hemp product; or
(2) Safe harbor manufacturer or storage facility.
195.2635. 1. Before July 1, 2027, each school district in this state shall adopt and
enforce a written policy prohibiting at all times the use of any industrial hemp-derived
consumable product by any person in school buildings, in school facilities, on school
campuses, and in or on any other school property owned or operated by the school
district. The policy shall also prohibit the use of any industrial hemp-derived
consumable product by persons attending a school-sponsored event at a location not
listed in this subsection if in the presence of students or school personnel or in an area
where smoking or other use of an industrial hemp-derived consumable product is
otherwise prohibited by law.
2. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 1 of this section or any other
provision of sections 195.2550 to 195.2635 to the contrary, a licensed health care

HB 2768 23
professional may administer an industrial hemp-derived consumable product to a
student at a school under the following conditions:
(1) The student has a recommendation from a licensed health care professional
specifying the reason for the administration, the suggested product, and the suggested
dosage;
(2) The parent or legal guardian of the student has provided a letter giving
express permission to administer the product to the student in accordance with the
recommendation of the licensed health care professional;
(3) For each industrial hemp-derived consumable product to be administered,
the student's parent or legal guardian has submitted a validly issued certificate of
analysis from an independent testing laboratory with testing results that meet the
requirements of section 195.2570; and
(4) For each industrial hemp-derived consumable product to be administered,
no more than a three-month supply of the product is provided to the school at any given
time.
3. Any industrial hemp-derived consumable product provided to a school under
this section shall be kept in an area that is inaccessible to other students, teachers, staff,
and administrators.
✔